Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.020

Who may file.

The information may be filed by the prosecuting attorney in the superior court of the proper county, upon his or her own relation, whenever he or she shall deem it his or her duty to do so, or shall be directed by the court or other competent authority, or by any other person on his or her own relation, whenever he or she claims an interest in the office, franchise, or corporation which is the subject of the information.

[ 2011 c 336 s 237; Code 1881 s 703; 1877 p 143 s 707; 1854 p 216 s 469; RRS s 1035.]